Utah statutes.
63M-7-505.   Board and office within Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice.

(1)  The Crime Victim Reparations and Assistance Board and the Utah Office for Victims of Crime are placed within the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice for the provision by the commission of administrative and support services.

(2)  The board or the director may request assistance from the Commission on Criminal and Juvenile Justice, the Department of Public Safety, and other state agencies in conducting research or monitoring victims' programs.

